Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1061
Section and repeal of section, how construed.

Section 66-1060 and the repeal of section 70-627.01 shall not be construed to affect the operating authority of any electric generation facility owned or operated by any Nebraska electric utility on September 9, 1995.

Laws 1995, LB 120, § 2.